California, session 20252026, AB2515.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 10275 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:10275. (a) The department shall establish rules and regulations for the staffing of all center-based child care childcare and development programs under contract with the department.(1) Priority shall be given by the department to the employment of persons in child development programs with ethnic backgrounds which that are similar to those of the child for whom child development services are provided.(2) For purposes of staffing child care childcare and development programs, the role of a teacher in child supervision means direct supervision of the children as well as supervision of aides and groups of children.(3) Family child care childcare homes shall operate pursuant to adult/child ratios prescribed in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 86001) of Division 6 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.(b) Approval by the department of any ongoing or new programs seeking to operate under the ratios and standards established by the department under this chapter shall be based upon the following considerations:(1) The type of facility in which care is being or is to be provided.(2) The ability of the department to implement a funding source change.(3) The proportion of nonsubsidized children enrolled or to be enrolled by the agency.(4) The most cost-effective ratios possible for the type of services provided or to be provided by the agency.(c) The department shall apply for waivers of federal requirements as are necessary to carry out this section.